California statutes. Civil Code
California law requires that you receive this information because the demand letter or court complaint you received with this document claims that you have discriminated, with respect to the price charged for services of similar or like kind, against a person because of that person’s gender.

YOU HAVE IMPORTANT LEGAL OBLIGATIONS. State law requires that businesses charge the same price for the same services, or services of the same or similar kind, regardless of the customer’s
 gender. In addition, state law requires that certain business establishments clearly and conspicuously disclose to their customers in writing the pricing for each standard service provided. The posting requirement applies to the following businesses:

(1) Tailors or businesses providing aftermarket clothing alterations.

(2) Barbers or hair salons.

(3) Dry cleaners and laundries providing services to individuals.

YOU HAVE IMPORTANT LEGAL RIGHTS. The allegations made in the accompanying demand letter or court complaint do not mean that you are required to pay any money unless and until a court finds you liable. Moreover, RECEIPT OF A DEMAND LETTER OR COURT COMPLAINT AND THIS ADVISORY DOES NOT NECESSARILY MEAN YOU WILL BE FOUND LIABLE FOR ANYTHING.

You have the right to seek assistance or advice about this demand letter or complaint from any person of your choice. If you have insurance, you may also wish to contact your insurance provider. Your best interest may be served by seeking legal advice or representation from an attorney, but you may also represent yourself and file the necessary court papers to protect your interests if you are served with a court complaint. If you have hired an attorney to represent you, you should immediately notify your attorney.ADDITIONAL THINGS YOU SHOULD KNOW

WHEN YOU CAN AND CANNOT CHARGE DIFFERENT PRICES: The Gender Tax Repeal Act of 1995 (California Civil Code Section 51.6) prohibits a business from charging a different price for the same service because of the gender of the person receiving the service. However, you may charge different prices based specifically upon the
 amount of time, difficulty, or cost of providing the services.

POSTING PRICES: The Gender Tax Repeal Act of 1995 also requires that certain businesses clearly disclose to the customer in writing the price of each standard service provided. This pricing disclosure is required for the following businesses: tailors or businesses providing aftermarket clothing alterations; barbers or hair salons; dry cleaners and laundries providing service to individuals. The price list must be posted in a place where customers will likely see it and it must be in no less than 14-point boldface font. A business must also provide a written copy of the prices to the customer if one is requested by the customer. Finally, a business must clearly and conspicuously display a sign, in no less than 24-point font, that reads:

“CALIFORNIA LAW PROHIBITS ANY BUSINESS ESTABLISHMENT FROM DISCRIMINATING, WITH RESPECT TO THE PRICE CHARGED FOR SERVICES OF
 SIMILAR OR LIKE KIND, AGAINST A PERSON BECAUSE OF THE PERSON’S GENDER. A COMPLETE PRICE LIST IS AVAILABLE UPON REQUEST.”

RIGHT TO CORRECT A POSTING VIOLATION ONLY: If you receive a written notice claiming that you have failed to properly post any of the above information, you have 30 days to correct the violation. If you fail to correct the violation you will be liable for a civil penalty of $1,000. (Note that the 30-day period to correct applies only to posting violations, not to discriminatory pricing violations.)(d) This section does not apply to an action brought by the Attorney General or any district attorney, city attorney, or county counsel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   (AB 1615)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

55.63.

(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2019, the Department of Consumer Affairs shall develop a pamphlet or other informational materials for use by the following business establishments: tailors and businesses providing aftermarket clothing alterations; barbers and hair salons; and dry cleaners and laundries providing services to individuals. The pamphlet shall explain the business’ rights and obligations under Section 51.6 in clear and concise language. Specifically, the pamphlet shall explain that the business is prohibited from charging different prices for services of similar or like kind based on the customer’s gender, unless the price difference is based upon the amount of time, difficulty, or cost of providing the services and
 that the business shall disclose a price list and sign in the manner prescribed in subdivision (f) of Section 51.6. The pamphlet shall explain that a business has 30 days to correct any violation of the posting requirements in subdivision (f) of Section 51.6 and that a business that fails to correct within 30 days of receiving notice of the violation is liable for a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000). The department may include any other information that would help the business comply with Section 51.6. The department shall subsequently revise the pamphlet, as necessary.

(2) The department shall provide the pamphlet or other informational materials required by paragraph (1) to an affected business establishment at the time that the business
 establishment applies for or renews a license, at the time of any inspection, or at both times. The department shall post a copy of the pamphlet or other informational materials on its internet website.

(3) Commencing October 1, 2020, the department shall provide the pamphlet and other informational materials required by paragraph (1) in English, Spanish, Chinese, Tagalog, Vietnamese, and Korean.

(b) By October 1,
 2020, the department shall develop a written notice explaining the requirements and obligations specified in Section 51.6. The notice shall be available in English, Spanish, Chinese, Tagalog, Vietnamese, and Korean. The department shall post a copy of the notice in each language on its internet website in a format available for download. The department shall subsequently revise the notice, as necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 293, Sec. 2.   (AB 1607)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.57. Gender Neutral Retail Departments [55.7. - 55.8.]

55.7.

The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(a) Unjustified differences in similar products that are traditionally marketed either for girls or for boys can be more easily identified by the consumer if similar items are displayed closer to one another in one, undivided area of the retail sales floor.

(b) Keeping similar items that are traditionally marketed either for girls or for boys separated makes it more difficult for the consumer to compare the products and incorrectly implies that their use by one gender is inappropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 750, Sec. 1.   (AB 1084)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

55.8.

(a) A retail department store that offers childcare items or toys for sale shall maintain a gender neutral section or area, to be labeled at the discretion of the retailer, in which a reasonable selection of the items and toys for children that it sells shall be displayed, regardless of whether they have been traditionally marketed for either girls or for boys.

(b) This section shall apply only to retail department stores that are physically located in California that have a total of 500
 or more employees across all California retail department store locations. This section shall not apply to retail department stores that are physically located outside California.

(c) Beginning on January 1, 2024, a retail department store that fails to comply with this section is liable for a civil penalty, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a first violation or five hundred dollars ($500) for a subsequent violation, which may be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, or a district attorney or city attorney, in any court of competent jurisdiction. If the Attorney General, district attorney, or city attorney prevails in an action under this subdivision, the court shall award to the Attorney General, district attorney, or city attorney reasonable
 attorney’s fees and costs.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Childcare item” means any product designed or intended by the manufacturer to facilitate sleep, relaxation, or the feeding of children, or to help children with sucking or teething.

(2) “Children” means persons 12 years of age or less. 

(3) “Toy” means a product designed or intended by the manufacturer to be used by children when they play.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 750, Sec. 1.   (AB 1084)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.6. CONFIDENTIALITY OF MEDICAL INFORMATION [56. - 56.37.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [56. - 56.07.]

56.

This part may be cited as the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

56.05.

For purposes of this part:

(a) “Authorization” means permission granted in accordance with Section 56.11 or 56.21 for the disclosure of medical information.

(b) “Authorized recipient” means a person who is authorized to receive medical information pursuant to Section 56.10 or 56.20.

(c) “Confidential communications request” means a request by a subscriber or enrollee that health care service plan communications containing medical information be communicated to them at a specific mail or email address or specific telephone number, as designated by the subscriber or enrollee.

(d) “Contractor” means a person or entity that is a medical group, independent practice association, pharmaceutical benefits manager, or a medical service organization and is not a health care service plan or provider of health care. “Contractor” does not include insurance institutions as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 791.02 of the Insurance Code or pharmaceutical benefits managers licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(e) “Enrollee” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) “Expiration date or event” means a specified date or an occurrence
 relating to the individual to whom the medical information pertains or the purpose of the use or disclosure, after which the provider of health care, health care service plan,
 pharmaceutical company, or contractor is no longer authorized to disclose the medical information.

(g) “Health care service plan” means an entity regulated pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(h) “Licensed health care professional” means a person licensed or certified pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, the Osteopathic Initiative Act or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, or Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) “Marketing” means to make a communication about a product or service that encourages
 recipients of the communication to purchase or use the product or service.

“Marketing” does not include any of the following:

(1) Communications made orally or in writing for which the communicator does not receive direct or indirect remuneration, including, but not limited to, gifts, fees, payments, subsidies, or other economic benefits, from a third party for making the communication.

(2) Communications made to current enrollees solely for the purpose of describing a provider’s participation in an existing health care provider network or health plan network of a Knox-Keene licensed health plan to which the enrollees already subscribe; communications made to current enrollees solely for the purpose of describing if, and the extent to
 which, a product or service, or payment for a product or service, is provided by a provider, contractor, or plan or included in a plan of benefits of a Knox-Keene licensed health plan to which the enrollees already subscribe; or communications made to plan enrollees describing the availability of more cost-effective pharmaceuticals.

(3) Communications that are tailored to the circumstances of a particular individual to educate or advise the individual about treatment options, and otherwise maintain the individual’s adherence to a prescribed course of medical treatment, as provided in Section 1399.901 of the Health and Safety Code, for a chronic and seriously debilitating or life-threatening condition as defined in subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 1367.21 of the Health and Safety Code, if the health care provider, contractor, or health plan receives
 direct or indirect remuneration, including, but not limited to, gifts, fees, payments, subsidies, or other economic benefits, from a third party for making the communication, if all of the following apply:

(A) The individual receiving the communication is notified in the communication in typeface no smaller than 14-point type of the fact that the provider, contractor, or health plan has been remunerated and the source of the remuneration.

(B) The individual is provided the opportunity to opt out of receiving future remunerated communications.

(C) The communication contains instructions in typeface no smaller than 14-point type describing how the individual can opt out of receiving further communications by calling a
 toll-free number of the health care provider, contractor, or health plan making the remunerated communications. Further communication shall not be made to an individual who has opted out after 30 calendar days from the date the individual makes the opt-out request.

(j) (1) “Medical information” means any individually identifiable information, in electronic or physical form, in possession of or derived from a provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, or contractor regarding a patient’s medical history, mental health application information, reproductive or sexual health application information,
 mental or physical condition, or treatment. “Individually identifiable” means that the medical information includes or contains any element of personal identifying information sufficient to allow identification of the individual, such as the patient’s name, address, electronic mail address, telephone number, or social security number, or other information that, alone or in combination with other publicly available information, reveals the identity of the individual.

(2) If individually identifying information regarding immigration status, including current and prior immigration status, or place of birth, is known or collected in electronic or physical form by a provider of health care, health care service plan, pharmaceutical company, or contractor regarding a patient’s medical history, it
 shall be treated as medical information, as defined in paragraph (1).

(k) “Mental health application information” means information related to a consumer’s inferred or diagnosed mental health or substance use disorder, as defined in Section 1374.72 of the Health and Safety Code, collected by a mental health digital service.

(l) “Mental health digital service” means a mobile-based application or internet website that collects mental health application information from a consumer, markets itself as facilitating mental health services to a consumer, and uses the information to facilitate mental health services to a consumer.

(m) “Patient” means a natural person, whether or not still living, who
 received health care services from a provider of health care and to whom medical information pertains.

(n) “Pharmaceutical company” means a company or business, or an agent or representative thereof, that manufactures, sells, or distributes pharmaceuticals, medications, or prescription drugs. “Pharmaceutical company” does not include a pharmaceutical benefits manager, as included in subdivision (c), or a provider of health care.

(o) “Protected individual” means any adult covered by the subscriber’s health care service plan or a minor who can consent to a health care service without the consent of a parent or legal guardian, pursuant to state or federal law. “Protected individual” does not include an individual that lacks the capacity to give informed consent for health care
 pursuant to Section 813 of the Probate Code.

(p) “Provider of health care” means a person licensed or certified pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code; a person licensed pursuant to the
 Osteopathic Initiative Act or the Chiropractic Initiative Act; a person certified pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code; or a clinic, health dispensary, or health facility licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code. “Provider of health care” does not include insurance institutions as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 791.02 of the Insurance Code.

(q) “Reproductive or sexual health application information” means information about a consumer’s reproductive health, menstrual cycle, fertility, pregnancy, pregnancy outcome, plans to conceive, or type of sexual activity collected by a reproductive or sexual health digital service, including, but not limited to, information from which one can infer someone’s pregnancy status, menstrual
 cycle, fertility, hormone levels, birth control use, sexual activity, or gender identity.

(r) “Reproductive or sexual health digital service” means a mobile-based application or internet website that collects reproductive or sexual health application information from a consumer, markets itself as facilitating reproductive or sexual health services to a consumer, and uses the information to facilitate reproductive or sexual health services to a consumer.

(s) “Sensitive services” means all health care services related to mental or behavioral health, sexual and reproductive health, sexually transmitted infections, substance use disorder, gender-affirming care, and intimate partner violence, and includes services described in Sections 6924, 6925, 6926, 6927, 6928, 6929, and 6930 of
 the Family Code, and Sections 121020 and 124260 of the Health and Safety Code, obtained by a patient at or above the minimum age specified for consenting to the service specified in the section.

(t) “Subscriber” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code.

(u) “Immigration enforcement” means any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 123, Sec. 1.   (SB 81)   Effective September 20, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

56.06.

(a) Any business organized for the purpose of maintaining medical information in order to make the information available to an individual or to a provider of health care at the request of the individual or a provider of health care, for purposes of allowing the individual to manage the individual’s information, or for the diagnosis and treatment of the individual, shall be deemed to be a provider of health care subject to the requirements of this part. However, this section shall not be construed to make a business specified in this subdivision a provider of health care for purposes of any law other than this part, including laws that specifically incorporate by reference the definitions of this part.

(b) Any business that offers software or hardware to consumers,
 including a mobile application or other related device that is designed to maintain medical information in order to make the information available to an individual or a provider of health care at the request of the individual or a provider of health care, for purposes of allowing the individual to manage the individual’s information, or for the diagnosis, treatment, or management of a medical condition of the individual, shall be deemed to be a provider of health care subject to the requirements of this part. However, this section shall not be construed to make a business specified in this subdivision a provider of health care for purposes of any law other than this part, including laws that specifically incorporate by reference the definitions of this part.

(c) Any business that is licensed pursuant to Division 10 (commencing
 with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code that is authorized to receive or receives identification cards
 issued pursuant to Section 11362.71 of the Health and Safety Code or information contained in a physician’s recommendation issued in accordance with Article 25 (commencing with Section 2525) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code shall be deemed to be a provider of health care subject to the requirements of this part. However, this section shall not be construed to make a business specified in this subdivision a provider of health care for purposes of any law other than this part, including laws that specifically incorporate by reference the definitions of this part.

(d) Any business that offers a mental health digital service to a consumer for the purpose of allowing the individual to manage the individual’s information, or for the diagnosis, treatment, or management of a medical condition of the
 individual, shall be deemed to be a provider of health care subject to the requirements of this part. However, this section shall not be construed to make a business specified in this subdivision a provider of health care for purposes of any law other than this part, including laws that specifically incorporate by reference the definitions of this part.

(e) Any business that offers a reproductive or sexual health digital service to a consumer for the purpose of allowing the individual to manage the individual’s information, or for the diagnosis, treatment, or management of a medical condition of the individual, shall be deemed to be a provider of health care subject to the requirements of this part. However, this section shall not be construed to make a business specified in this subdivision a provider of health care for purposes of any law
 other than this part, including, but not limited to, laws that specifically incorporate by reference the definitions of this part.

(f) Any business described in this section shall maintain the same standards of confidentiality required of a provider of health care with respect to medical information disclosed to the business.

(g) Any business described in this section is subject to the penalties for improper use and disclosure of medical information prescribed in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 254, Sec. 2.   (AB 254)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

56.07.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), upon the patient’s written request, any corporation described in Section 56.06, or any other entity that compiles or maintains medical information for any reason, shall provide the patient, at no charge, with a copy of any medical profile, summary, or information maintained by the corporation or entity with respect to the patient.

(b) A request by a patient pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to be an authorization by the
 patient for the release or disclosure of any information to any person or entity other than the patient.

(c) This section shall not apply to any patient records that are subject to inspection by the patient pursuant to Section 123110 of the Health and Safety Code and shall not be deemed to limit the right of a health care provider to charge a fee for the preparation of a summary of patient records as provided in Section 123130 of the Health and Safety Code. This section shall not apply to a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or a disability insurer licensed pursuant to the Insurance Code. This section shall not apply to medical information compiled or maintained by a fire and casualty insurer or its retained counsel in the regular course of investigating or litigating a claim under a policy of insurance that it has written. For the purposes of this
 section, a fire and casualty insurer is an insurer writing policies that may be sold by a fire and casualty licensee pursuant to Section 1625 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1066, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Disclosure of Medical Information by Providers [56.10. - 56.16.]

56.10.

(a) A provider of health care, health care service plan, or contractor shall not disclose medical information regarding a patient of the provider of health care or an enrollee or subscriber of a health care service plan without first obtaining an authorization, except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c).

(b) A provider of health care, a health care service plan, or a contractor shall disclose medical information if the disclosure is compelled by any of the following:

(1) (A) A court order issued by a court of this
 state or a federal court, including, but not limited to, a court order issued by a court of this state pursuant to Section 2029.300 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to a foreign subpoena.

(B) A provider of health care, health care service plan, or contractor shall not comply with a court order that constitutes a foreign subpoena, absent a court order issued pursuant to Section 2029.300 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) A board, commission, or administrative agency for purposes of adjudication pursuant to its lawful authority.

(3) A party to a proceeding before a court or administrative agency pursuant to a subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, notice to appear served pursuant
 to Section 1987 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or any provision authorizing discovery in a proceeding before a court or administrative agency.

(4) A board, commission, or administrative agency pursuant to an investigative subpoena issued under Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(5) An arbitrator or arbitration panel, when arbitration is lawfully requested by either party, pursuant to a subpoena duces tecum issued under Section 1282.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or another provision authorizing discovery in a proceeding before an arbitrator or arbitration panel.

(6) A valid search warrant issued by a judicial officer, including a
 magistrate, to a governmental law enforcement agency, including a search warrant from another state that is based on either of the following and execution of the search warrant would not constitute a violation of Section 13778.2 of the Penal Code:

(A) Another state’s law, so long as that state’s law does not interfere with California law, including, but not limited to, the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).

(B) A foreign penal civil action, as defined in Section 2029.200 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(7) The patient or the patient’s representative pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 123100) of Part 1 of
 Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) A medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner, when requested in the course of an investigation by a medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner’s office for the purpose of identifying the decedent or locating next of kin, or when investigating deaths that may involve public health concerns, organ or tissue donation, child abuse, elder abuse, suicides, poisonings, accidents, sudden infant deaths, suspicious deaths, unknown deaths, or criminal deaths, or upon notification of, or investigation of, imminent deaths that may involve organ or tissue donation pursuant to Section 7151.15 of the Health and Safety Code, or when otherwise authorized by the decedent’s representative. Medical information requested by a medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner under this
 paragraph shall be limited to information regarding the patient who is the decedent and who is the subject of the investigation or who is the prospective donor and shall be disclosed to a medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner without delay upon request. A medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner shall not disclose the information contained in the medical record obtained pursuant to this paragraph to a third party without a court order or authorization pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.11.

(9) When otherwise specifically required by law.

(c) A provider of health care or a health care service plan may disclose medical information as follows:

(1) The information may be disclosed
 to providers of health care, health care service plans, contractors, or other health care professionals or facilities for purposes of diagnosis or treatment of the patient. This includes, in an emergency situation, the communication of patient information by radio transmission or other means between emergency medical personnel at the scene of an emergency, or in an emergency medical transport vehicle, and emergency medical personnel at a health facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The information may be disclosed to an insurer, employer, health care service plan, hospital service plan, employee benefit plan, governmental authority, contractor, or other person or entity responsible for paying for health care services rendered to the patient, to the extent
 necessary to allow responsibility for payment to be determined and payment to be made. If (A) the patient is, by reason of a comatose or other disabling medical condition, unable to consent to the disclosure of medical information and (B) no other arrangements have been made to pay for the health care services being rendered to the patient, the information may be disclosed to a governmental authority to the extent necessary to determine the patient’s eligibility for, and to obtain, payment under a governmental program for health care services provided to the patient. The information may also be disclosed to another provider of health care or health care service plan as necessary to assist the other provider or health care service plan in obtaining payment for health care services rendered by that provider of health care or health care service plan to the patient.

(3) The information may be disclosed to a person or entity that provides billing, claims management, medical data processing, or other administrative services for providers of health care or health care service plans or for any of the persons or entities specified in paragraph (2). However, that disclosed information shall not be further disclosed by the recipient in a way that would violate this part.

(4) The information may be disclosed to organized committees and agents of professional societies or of medical staffs of licensed hospitals, licensed health care service plans, professional standards review organizations, independent medical review organizations and their selected reviewers, utilization and quality control peer review organizations as established by Congress in Public Law 97-248 in 1982, contractors, or persons or
 organizations insuring, responsible for, or defending professional liability that a provider may incur, if the committees, agents, health care service plans, organizations, reviewers, contractors, or persons are engaged in reviewing the competence or qualifications of health care professionals or in reviewing health care services with respect to medical necessity, level of care, quality of care, or justification of charges.

(5) The information in the possession of a provider of health care or a health care service plan may be reviewed by a private or public body responsible for licensing or accrediting the provider of health care or a health care service plan. However, no patient-identifying medical information may be removed from the premises except as expressly permitted or required elsewhere by law, nor shall that information be
 further disclosed by the recipient in a way that would violate this part.

(6) The information may be disclosed to a medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or county coroner in the course of an investigation by a medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner’s office when requested for all purposes not included in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b). A medical examiner, forensic pathologist, or coroner shall not disclose the information contained in the medical record obtained pursuant to this paragraph to a third party without a court order or authorization pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 56.11.

(7) The information may be disclosed to public agencies, clinical investigators, including investigators conducting epidemiologic studies, health care research
 organizations, and accredited public or private nonprofit educational or health care institutions for bona fide research purposes. However, no information so disclosed shall be further disclosed by the recipient in a way that would disclose the identity of a patient or violate this part.

(8) A provider of health care or health care service plan that has created medical information as a result of employment-related health care services to an employee conducted at the specific prior written request and expense of the employer may disclose to the employee’s employer that part of the information that:

(A) Is relevant in a lawsuit, arbitration, grievance, or other claim or challenge to which the employer and the employee are parties and in which the patient has placed in issue the patient’s
 medical history, mental or physical condition, or treatment, provided that information may only be used or disclosed in connection with that proceeding.

(B) Describes functional limitations of the patient that may entitle the patient to leave from work for medical reasons or limit the patient’s fitness to perform the patient’s present employment, provided that no statement of medical cause is included in the information disclosed.

(9) Unless the provider of health care or a health care service plan is notified in writing of an agreement by the sponsor, insurer, or administrator to the contrary, the information may be disclosed to a sponsor, insurer, or administrator of a group or individual insured or uninsured plan or policy that the patient seeks coverage by or benefits
 from, if the information was created by the provider of health care or health care service plan as the result of services conducted at the specific prior written request and expense of the sponsor, insurer, or administrator for the purpose of evaluating the application for coverage or benefits.

(10) The information may be disclosed to a health care service plan by providers of health care that contract with the health care service plan and may be transferred between providers of health care that contract with the health care service plan, for the purpose of administering the health care service plan. Medical information shall not otherwise be disclosed by a health care service plan except in accordance with this part.

(11) This part does not prevent the disclosure by a provider of health
 care or a health care service plan to an insurance institution, agent, or support organization, subject to Article 6.6 (commencing
 with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code, of medical information if the insurance institution, agent, or support organization has complied with all of the requirements for obtaining the information pursuant to Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code.

(12) The information relevant to the patient’s condition, care, and treatment provided may be disclosed to a probate court investigator in the course of an investigation required or authorized in a conservatorship proceeding under the Guardianship-Conservatorship Law as defined in Section 1400 of the Probate Code, or to a probate court investigator, probation officer, or domestic relations investigator engaged in determining the need for an initial guardianship or continuation of an
 existing guardianship.

(13) The information may be disclosed to an organ procurement organization or a tissue bank processing the tissue of a decedent for transplantation into the body of another person, but only with respect to the donating decedent, for the purpose of aiding the transplant. For the purpose of this paragraph, “tissue bank” and “tissue” have the same meanings as defined in Section 1635 of the Health and Safety Code.

(14) The information may be disclosed when the disclosure is otherwise specifically authorized by law, including, but not limited to, the voluntary reporting, either directly or indirectly, to the United States Food and Drug Administration of adverse events related to drug products or medical device problems, or to disclosures made pursuant to
 subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section
 11167 of the Penal Code by a person making a report pursuant to Sections 11165.9 and 11166 of the Penal Code, provided that those disclosures concern a report made by that person.

(15) Basic information, including the patient’s name, city of residence, age, sex, and general condition, may be disclosed to a state-recognized or federally recognized disaster relief organization for the purpose of responding to disaster welfare inquiries.

(16) The information may be disclosed to a third party for purposes of encoding, encrypting, or otherwise anonymizing data. However, no information so disclosed shall be further disclosed by the recipient in a way that would violate this part, including the unauthorized manipulation of coded or encrypted medical information that reveals
 individually identifiable medical information.

(17) For purposes of disease management programs and services as defined in Section 1399.901 of the Health and Safety Code, information may be disclosed as follows: (A) to an entity contracting with a health care service plan or the health care service plan’s contractors to monitor or administer care of enrollees for a covered benefit, if the disease management services and care are authorized by a treating physician, or (B) to a disease management organization, as defined in Section 1399.900 of the Health and Safety Code, that complies fully with the physician authorization requirements of Section 1399.902 of the Health and Safety Code, if the health care service plan or its contractor provides or has provided a description of the disease management services to a treating physician or to